Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB114.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
26 SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 2 IS CREATED TO
27 READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/6/2025 12:45 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1200
1 The Treeing Walker Coonhound is named and designated as the official state dog of
2 Kentucky.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/6/2025 12:45 PM Jacketed